Hawaii statutes.
§466J-5 Radiographers, radiation
therapists, and nuclear medicine technologists; qualifications and licenses.
(a) An applicant for a license to practice as a radiographer or as a radiation
therapist shall submit to the board written evidence, verified by oath or
affirmation, that the applicant is registered in good standing with the
American Registry of Radiologic Technologists.

(b) An applicant for a license to practice as
a nuclear medicine technologist shall submit to the board written evidence, verified
by oath or affirmation, that the applicant is:

(1) Certified in good standing with the Nuclear
Medicine Technology Certification Board;

(2) Registered in good standing with the American
Registry of Radiologic Technologists in Nuclear Medicine;

(3) Registered in good standing with the American
Registry of Radiologic Technologists in Radiography with nuclear medicine
technology clinical training and experience acceptable to the board; or

(4) Practicing as a nuclear medicine technologist
with nuclear medicine technology clinical training and experience acceptable to
the board.

(c) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to further define and regulate the practices authorized for
radiographers, radiation therapists, and nuclear medicine technologists.

(d) The board shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 to enable licensed radiographers, licensed radiation therapists, and
licensed nuclear medicine technologists from other states having standards that
are comparable to those in Hawaii to obtain licensure without the need for
examination.

(e) The applicant applying for a license to
practice as a radiographer, as a radiation therapist, or as a nuclear medicine
technologist shall pay a nonrefundable application fee to the department. All fees
received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the
noise, radiation, and indoor air quality special fund established pursuant to
section 342P-7; provided that any other moneys collected pursuant to this
chapter shall be deposited with the director of finance to the credit of the
general fund, unless otherwise provided by law.

(f) Any person who holds a license to practice
as a radiographer shall have the right to use the title "certified
radiographer". No other person shall assume this title or any other
words, letters, signs, or devices to indicate that the person is a certified
radiographer.

(g) Any person who holds a license to practice
as a radiation therapist shall have the right to use the title "certified
radiation therapist". No other person shall assume this title or any
other words, letters, signs, or devices to indicate that the person is a
certified radiation therapist.

(h) Any person who holds a license to practice
as a nuclear medicine technologist shall have the right to use the title
"certified nuclear medicine technologist". No other person shall
assume this title or any other words, letters, signs, or devices to indicate
that the person is a certified nuclear medicine technologist.

(i) The form of every license shall be
prescribed by and issued in the name of the board. [L 1974, c 253, pt of §2; am
L 1980, c 128, pt of §1; am L 1990, c 273, §7; am L 1991, c 42, §2; am L 1994,
c 169, §§7, 9; am L 1995, c 143, §§5, 10; am L 1996, c 164, §1; am L 1998, c
311, §§16, 22]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next